Illinois, session 104th, HB1183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 10-2.1-9 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-9)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-2.1-9)7    Sec. 10-2.1-9. Original appointments; Preferences; 8Limitation. 9    (a) The The board of fire and police commissioners shall 10give preference for original appointment to persons designated 11in Section 10-2.1-8 whose names appear on any register of 12eligibles resulting from an examination for original entrance 13in the classified service of the fire and police departments 14of any municipality coming under the provisions of this 15Division 2.1 by adding to the final grade average which they 16receive or will receive as the result of any examination held 17for original entrance, 5 points. The board shall also give 18preference to persons eligible under subsection (b) as 19provided in that subsection. The numerical result thus 20attained shall be applied by the board of fire and police 21commissioners in determining the position of such persons on 22any eligibility list which has been created as the result of 23any examination for original entrance for purposes of   HB1183- 2 -LRB104 07309 RTM 17348 b1preference in certification and appointment from such 2eligibility list. The board shall strike off the names of 3candidates for original appointment after such names have been 4on the list for more than 2 years.5    (b) All persons who, on or after the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of 1993, have been paid-on-call certified 7firefighters II, paramedics, or any combination of those 8capacities, of the municipality shall be awarded 0.5 point for 9each year of successful service in one or more of those 10capacities, up to a maximum of 5 points at the time of 11examination for original appointment to the classified service 12of the fire department. Certified firefighters III shall be 13awarded one point per year up to a maximum of 5 points. 14Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed as 15full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a fire 16protection district or another municipality for at least 2 17years shall have the same preference as paid-on-call 18personnel. These additional points presuppose a rating scale 19totalling 100 points available for the eligibility list. If 20more or fewer points are used in the rating scale for the 21eligibility list, the points awarded under this subsection 22shall be increased or decreased by a factor equal to the total 23possible points available for the examination divided by 100.24    No person entitled to additional points under this 25subsection shall be required to claim that preference or 26credit before an examination is held. The preference shall be   HB1183- 3 -LRB104 07309 RTM 17348 b1given after the posting or publication of the eligibility 2list. To qualify for the preference, applicants who are 3eligible for credit under this subsection shall make a claim 4for that credit, in writing, within 10 days after the posting 5of the eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. 6Upon request by the board of fire and police commissioners, 7the governing body of the municipality or (in the case of 8applicants from outside the municipality) the governing body 9of any fire protection district or any other municipality 10shall certify to the board of fire and police commissioners, 11within 10 days of the request, the number of years of 12successful paid-on-call service of any person. A candidate may 13not receive preference points under this subsection if the 14amount of points awarded would place the candidate before a 15veteran on the eligibility list.16(Source: P.A. 88-440.)